Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2511
Poisons; sale; violations; penalty.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation violating any of the provisions of sections 71-2502 to 71-2511 or any of the rules or regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to sections 71-2502 to 71-2511 shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 566;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-993;

R.S.1943, § 81-635;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 166;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 431;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 629;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 548.

Rules and regulations, see section 38-2899.